# Chapter 2: Report and|Countermeasures

"Has Velzard moved?"

Vega, who was staring at the video with a pallid expression, nodded to Feldway.

"Tch, both Demon Lord Milim and Zelanus are even more powerful than I imagined... Shit, they're powerful as hell. Looking at that and smiling calmly, after all, the current me doesn't even come close to that Velzard woman..."

Even Vega seemed to have realized the reality after watching Milim and Zelanus fight. No matter how confident Vega was, he could at least understand the difference with Milim and Zelanus.

"Don't be so upset. I, too, had my own considerations when I heard that our long-time enemies, the insectars, had been destroyed."

Zalario, who had just been recalled, spoke up in this way.
Milim's forces had won a victory against the powerful enemy that had tormented them so much. Moreover, despite the heavy damage, there were no casualties among Milim's forces.
It could be said that it was due to a difference in conditions and strategy, but Zalario was at fault when he could not prepare for it. In any case, it was no excuse, and the reality was that Milim's team was better than Zalario's team.
It was no wonder Zalario was not amused.

"So, what are you going to do, Feldway?"

That remark was a question about Velzard's actions. She seemed to be planning something, but Feldway left it alone.
Zalario believed that the rapidly changing situation had deviated from the original plan, and he wanted to say that it was time to correct the course.
And there was one more person who was indignant.

"That's right. If you hadn't interfered with me, I would have defeated that divine enemy by now! Just what is your plan? Let's hear your explanation right now!!"

Upon returning to the Heavenly Star Palace, Feldway ordered Mai to visualize the war situation in various parts of the world. Then, he ordered Zalario to bring back Jahil, who had been launching a diversionary tactic against Luminas's camp.
Jahil's behavior was also too flashy to be called a diversion.
Zalario was right to stop him, but Jahil, who had been stopped, did not seem to be amused. He was questioning Feldway as if planning to attack him.

"Hmph, don't be so hasty. You couldn't have taken down Demon Lord Luminas by yourself anyway."

"What, are you mocking me?"

"That's not the case. I'm just trying to proceed cautiously. Look, with Dagruel joining our ranks, the balance of power is now greatly in our favor. With Fenn as a Three Star Commander, Luminas is nothing but a distant memory."

Feldway told Jahil this to appease his anger. However, Jahil's dissatisfaction did not go away.

"Certainly, I acknowledge Fenn's power. But Luminas, the enemy of the Divine Ancestor, must be dealt with by my own hands!"

In a sense, Jahil's dissatisfaction was a grudge born of anger. Whether or not the takeover of Footman had anything to do with it was not clear, but his heart was boiling over with raging anger.
That is why he attacked Luminas in a somewhat out-of-control manner. When he was stopped, Jahil was so furious at himself why he was hindered.
But the next moment...

"Do you not hear me?"

It was Feldway's one question, quietly uttered.
It was not particularly intimidating, and it was uttered in a normal way. And yet, the air of authority that overpowered the statement caused even Dino and the others who were not participating in the conversation to become tense.

"N-no, it was my fault."

Jahil regained his composure and immediately apologized. It was a very wise decision.

"Feldway, your dominance is poisonous to those who are not used to it. Please remember that now that you are in your true form, you are nothing compared to what you used to be."

With Zalario defending Jahil, the situation was finally settled.

![break]

And so the story goes back to the beginning.
Currently, Feldway had three strategic goals.

- Get the Ultimate Skill 'Hope King Sariel' from Hero Chronoa.

- Eliminate the risk factor Hero Masayuki. This included taking the Ultimate Skill 'Covenant King Uriel'.

- And the most important objective, take the 'Dragon Factor' from Veldora.

![break]

Feldway had decided to rethink his objectives.
First, he had to collect the skills.
Since he had inherited Michael's powers, Feldway was now able to identify the angelic Ultimate Skills, however...

It had been Michael, not Feldway, who was obsessed about collecting angelic powers. Since he had been the will that resided in the powers, he thought that consolidating all the other powers into one would lead to the all-powerful.
All-powerful---in other words, the return of the omniscient and omnipotent^[This is only one word in Japanese, but the meaning is both the words omniscient and omnipotent in English.] Creator.

The theory seemed logical, but Feldway was skeptical.
The reason was that Veldanava was not omniscient and omnipotent.
In the first place, since Veldanava himself had said that he renounced his omniscience and omnipotence, there was no room to doubt his words.
On the contrary, Feldway even thought about how nice it would be if Veldanava had lied. If that were the case, he would not have lost his power and been killed by humans.

But, then again, it was Veldanava himself who had given the humans their desires. The result of this was a cycle of cause and effect, and it was only self-inflicted.
That is why Feldway did not doubt that Veldanava was no longer omniscient and omnipotent.
For that reason, it did not make sense to keep looking for the missing Skills. Moreover, it was meaningless to take all those powers if there were no recipients.

Feldway and Michael had planned to manifest Veldanava by using the best body of the lineage of the first hero as a vessel. However, this plan had completely failed. Michael was defeated and his body was lost. Now that this had happened, Masayuki should be considered a lower priority.

*Emperor Masayuki, huh? I hate to be on the losing side, but victory or defeat was just a matter of time. It's not worth losing sight of the bigger picture,* Feldway decided.

Zalario and his team were unable to get Masayuki, who possessed the power of True Hero Rudra in his hands. Moreover, with Velgrynd in his ranks, they would only be beaten back with a half-hearted effort. At the very least, Feldway himself or Velzard would have to go there, or even ask Zelanus. Even if they won the battle, there seemed little to be gained.

As a result, the current objectives of the war were narrowed down.
If Masayuki was going to be left alone, then there was no point in going after Hero Chronoa.
Even if they eventually got rid of Masayuki, there was no need to target him first. They could just wait for him to come to them and avoid dispersing valuable forces.

*After all, all hope has been lost...*

As if to shake off those anxieties, Feldway's thoughts coalesced.

"So, what are you going to do?" Jahil asked impatiently, just in time.

"We are only targeting Veldora's dragon factor," Feldway proposed. "However, we need to move in such a way that our true mission is not revealed."

![break]

Then, after everyone left, Feldway muttered to himself, "Now then, will Velzard accomplish what she set out to do?"

Velzard held the key to victory in this battle. At least, that is what Feldway believed.

"Her desire is real. Therefore, nothing will change the outcome."

Feldway was convinced of this, and a cold smile appeared on his beautiful face.


![hard scene break]


In the holy city where Shion and Adalmann and the others were sent---the Holy Empire of Lubelius.
I was sitting on the sofa, slowly relaxing.
Next to me, Shion was proudly requesting another cup of tea.
Luminas's maids responded accordingly. Shion accepted it as a matter of course, partaking in the tea ceremony prepared on the table, so I guess she felt no sense of tension.

What's with that? I'm supposed to be superior in terms of position, so isn't this difference in reaction a bit strange?
Why am I, the master, so nervous over here while Shion, the one who is supposed to be the secretary, is so unconcerned...?
No, I don't get to think about it.

"Rimuru-sama, this sweet is delicious. I've already tested for poison, so please go ahead!"

Shion offered it to me, and I subconsciously put it in my mouth. I was wondering what kind of joke it was that Shion, who knew nothing about cooking, would be testing for poison, but that's fine. I didn't need to test for poison because it wouldn't work on me in the first place.

It sure is delicious. Shion may not have the best sense of aesthetics, but she did have a good sense of taste.
That's why I think it's unreasonable... I mean, she never tastes the food she makes before serving it to us. And now that she's working on perfecting the taste with her Skill, the appearance and texture are still bad.

"What do you think? Is it good?"

"Yes, it is. It's not too sweet and quite refreshing. I enjoy the way it crumbles in my mouth."

This pastry was like a financier. It had a subtle savory accent and was seriously delicious.
Shion heard my response and smiled widely. Then she dropped a bombshell of a statement.

"That's wonderful! I was confident this time as well, but I am glad to hear that Rimuru-sama is pleased!"

"Nnh?"

I paused involuntarily and stared at Shion. There was a smile on her face as usual. I turned my attention back to the sweet in my hand, and then looked at Shion again.

"Could it be that this..."

"Yes! I made it."

"That's a lie, right?!"

It was an unbelievable statement, but it appeared to be true. It had been a while since I saw Shion's smug face, but I could forgive her for bragging about it this time.
Shion had finally conquered the appearance and the texture of the food.
By the way...

"Did you use your Skill to make this taste and shape?"

"No. I made it with my own hands!"

Shion was showing tremendous progress. I guess a change of environment can be important after all. Shuna and Benimaru had not been able to improve her culinary skill no matter how many times they tried, but now Shion had suddenly awakened ever since she came to another country. Just what was the trigger? Just as I was thinking about that, I heard a voice answering my question.

"It was hard work."

Luminas came into the reception room blurting out these words. Luminas greeted me as I was getting up from my seat with a "Sorry to keep you waiting", and sat down on the sofa herself, as if there was no need to thank her. Then, she began to continue what was just said.

"What's with that? She said she could cook with full confidence, so I entrusted her with the task, and then she prepared a novel-looking dish that couldn't even be described as food at all!"

Luminas's tone was strong. The word "novel" carried such weight that I couldn't help but get a little mystified.

"What's more! The texture was terrible, but the taste was good, so it was incomprehensible. Some people were even trying to reproduce it for fun. I was so worried about the negative impact on our food culture that I had to make a move myself^[Luminas always addresses herself with "warawa" which is a Japanese archaic pronoun normally used by women in samurai families. The author wanted her to sound like a haughty noble, but he wasn't aware at that time that this pronoun was more of a self-deprecating and humble sounding way of reference.]!"

It seemed that she was feeling quite depressed and resentful.

"Uh?!" I was at a loss for words.

"B-but even so, I'm impressed that you were able to correct Shion. We had already given up on her long ago, so it's truly amazing."

When I tried to cover it up for the time being, Luminas gave me a scornful glare. Shion also gave me a look of protest with her cheeks puffed out. I pretended not to notice this and waited for Luminas's answer.

"I can only imagine how much you all have spoiled Shion, but that is none of my business. Therefore, I was going to leave it alone, but once it started to do some real damage, I couldn't do so anymore. And so, I intervened."

"Oh?"

Saying that I spoiled her would be a misnomer, but it couldn't be helped that it seemed that way from the outside. That being the case, apart from Shuna, Benimaru and I didn't know how to cook, so it's just that we couldn't take too strong of an attitude toward Shion. It would be pretty rude to point out things to others that I couldn't do myself.

And so, I had been hoping that Shuna or Gobichi-kun would give her criticism, but... Shuna was too kind and gave up quickly, and Gobichi-kun was too weak to reach Shion's heart. In the end, the situation had remained the same until now. The taste had improved, and it wasn't enough to kill people.

As a slime with a long life ahead of me, I should have tried cooking myself to get closer to Shion's feelings. If I had done so, I might have found more things to be improved and this problem might have been solved earlier. It was both my and Benimaru's fault for turning a blind eye to our weak areas. As I reflected on this, Luminas gave me the answer.

"You should taste the food before serving it to your guests, because it may be laced with poison!"

S-so that's it...
That's why Shion had been talking about poison testing just now.
Or rather, it was indeed a good idea.
It wasn't that Shion had a strange sense of taste, but she was simply the worst type of lousy cook who never tasted her food. If she got into the habit of tasting the food herself, she would naturally become aware of the problems with those dishes.

"As expected of you, Luminas. You are truly wise," I said my compliments from the bottom of my heart.

Then Luminas let out a "hmph!" and turned her head away from me, her cheeks lightly flushed with embarrassment.


![soft scene break]


I received the unexpected good news that Shion's cooking would improve, but it had nothing to do with the purpose of our visit here.

Ramiris reported that the battle between Milim and the insectar king Zelanus was at a stalemate. At the same time, the capital of Lubelius, the territory and home of Luminas, was being attacked by angelic forces from the sky.

Gobta and the others were sent to Milim as reinforcements, so things seemed to be okay there for the time being. With Milim there, they should be able to handle the situation unless something unexpected happens.

On the other hand, although Shion and Adalmann had been sent to support Luminas, I could not shake off my concerns about their battle strength. After all, the Holy Knight Order, which was the cornerstone of the Luminas fighting forces, had been placed in the Kingdom of Ingracia with Hinata, the leader of the Holy Knight Order. Luminas also had a fighting force called the Bloody Knights which consisted of vampires, but there were only about 400 of them.

Still, the Bloody Knights were individually over A-ranked, and there were several Surmounters who were as skilled lower-leveled Demon Lord Seeds. The quality of the team was quite high. Even so, I could not keep silent once I heard that Jahil's appearance had been confirmed. And so, I left the cleanup at the Kingdom of Ingracia to Hinata and Masayuki and came all the way over in a great hurry. And yet, there was no sign of a fight, and I was led here, tasting Shion's sweets and waiting for Luminas to arrive. Having said that, it had been only ten minutes at most before Luminas appeared. I was so surprised by Shion's progress that I ended up spending more time chatting with her.

![break]

All that out of the way, it was time to get down to brass tacks.

"So then, how did the battle with the angels go?"

"They retreated, so there was no serious damage. In the first place, it seems that attacking here was not part of the plan."

Luminas gave me a detailed account of the situation. As it turned out, it appeared that this place had been attacked because of Jahil's rampage, or as I called it, harassment.

"He and I have a history. We have been at odds with each other for a long time," said Luminas.

When I asked her what she meant, she did not tell me, but when I told her that I had already heard some of the story from Silvia-san, she told me with a disgusted look on her face.
First of all, Luminas had someone who could be called a father figure.

Divine Ancestor Twilight Valentine.
A mythical being also known as the Twilight King.

It seems that this Divine Ancestor Twilight created many intelligent life forms, and that some of the founders of these life forms became known as the Divine Ancestor's High Disciples.
The first of them was Jahil.
The second was Luminas, as Silvia-san had told me.
Each of the high disciples of the Divine Ancestor established their own country.
In Silvia-san's case, it seems that she herself only supported and helped her fellow high elves, but in the end, all elves were unified by her daughter El-tan, the Emperor Elmesia. Thus, the Sorcerer's Dynasty of Sarion was born. Incidentally, Silvia-san and Luminas were said to still have a secret friendship even now. El-tan had nothing to do with it, and only Luminas seemed to know about it.

"Basically, I didn't think I should interfere with Sarion. I did help them out a bit in the beginning, though."

That's what I was told. Since Sarion had been founded more than 2,000 years ago, I did not know if Luminas's story was true or not. However, there was no reason for them to lie as Luminas and Silvia-san, being long-lived species, were like living pieces of history.

Convinced that it was most likely true, I listened to the rest of the story. I was told that Luminas and Silvia-san were the only two of his disciples that were still alive today. At the very least, no one else seemed to keep in touch with them.

The ancestor of King Gazel, the founder of the High Dwarfs, was said to have passed away, and the founders of the Fire Spirits (Enki) and the Water Spirits (Siren) had probably reached the end of their lives. Only the high elves, who were similar to spirits, lived a long life.

Speaking of longevity, the high humans were the most likely to have lived a long life. This race was created purely by reversing the attributes of the Divine Ancestor.

"I don't like to admit it, but I am something like a replica of the Divine Ancestor, and strictly speaking, I am not a vampire but a High Blood. I was born from the blood of the Divine Ancestor. Jahil was created by cultivating the flesh of the Divine Ancestor. He does not seem to have inherited the ability to absorb power from others, but he, too, was close to immortality."

The Divine Ancestor did not need to eat but sustained himself by depriving others of their life force. He had no particular weaknesses and was the embodiment of immortality. The Divine Ancestor had devised two replicas of himself, the high human race that lived in the daytime, and the vampires who ruled the night.

A race that *lived in the daytime* was a metaphor. Plants produced energy through photosynthesis, and animals sustained life by eating them. Through predation of the animals, predators accumulated large amounts of energy, and the earth was enriched by the decomposition of their corpses via microorganisms. The role of those standing at the top of the food chain was given to the high humans. In other words, the high human race was a part of the food chain. Therefore, it was impossible for them to escape their life span, and Jahil was no exception.

The average lifespan of a normal person living in an urban area was about seventy years old. This was the case without any magical means to prolong life. Although medical treatment was not well developed here, people seemed to live longer than expected because of the magical cures for diseases. People living in rural areas or in areas adjacent to monster forests seemed to have a shorter average life expectancy. I should also add that these figures were calculated without including the deaths due to numerous disasters.

On the other hand, high humans apparently lived for several hundred to nearly a thousand years, which was similar to that of the long-eared elves. It seemed that their physical strength was different from that of modern humans, and because they had a high resistance to magicules, they could successfully utilize and take advantage of them.
But even so, as long as their bodies were not immortal, there was no escaping from their life span. That is why Jahil devised a method to extend his own lifespan indefinitely. That was the 'Secret Art of Spiritualization'.

If the three elements that made up the body---the material body, the spiritual body, and the astral body---could not be maintained at the same time, then he decided that it would be better for him to inherit only the minimum elements that could maintain his ego. In other words, Jahil succeeded in transforming his material body into a spiritual body in order to preserve only the spiritual body and the astral body.
Thus, Jahil was reborn as a spiritual life form of his own will.

Gadra's mystic art 'Reincarnation' was a very risky secret technique because it reincarnated the soul while protecting it with the astral body. However, the body obtained was completely one's own, and all the experience and knowledge would be inherited.

Razen's great secret art 'Possession' transferred the spiritual body and the astral body to another person's body, but the skills attached to the body were not inherited. It was much safer, but it was also incomplete in that the mana was dependent on the body and could become weak if not properly transferred.

On the other hand, Jahil's 'Secret Art of Spiritualization' was perfect. Since Jahil himself had become a spiritual life form, he could safely and reliably inherit all the knowledge, experience, and authority he had obtained.

"Although it was necessary to prepare a body to be used as a substitute, it appeared that he was able to obtain bodies from his own blood relatives as much as he wished. Thus, Jahil solved the problem regarding his life span," Luminas told me bitterly.

Indeed, if he had become a spiritual life form, it made sense that he was nearly immortal. I now understood that this was the reason why he was able to take over Footman so easily.

"However, perhaps because he was too conceited, he made a big mistake."

Luminas explained that while Jahil was absorbed in his own research, his subordinates who were in charge of politics began to compete with each other for supremacy, and before long, the country was divided. Eventually, the country was brought to ruin by the mistake of summoning the uncontrollable demon Guy.

"He resented me for destroying the Divine Ancestor and harbored hostility against me. I was glad to think that he had died on his own. I never thought that he would survive until now and be resurrected with such an insane amount of power."

That's right. Luminas had killed her father, the Divine Ancestor. For this reason, Jahil seems to have a grudge against Luminas. He was a troublesome opponent to be targeted by.

"Well. Even our Benimaru had a difficult time with him, so it's quite troublesome."

As I was giving Luminas some advice, Shion overheard my comment and interrupted me.

"Eh? Benimaru lost?!"

Perhaps she was surprised to hear that Benimaru had lost. Or rather, I'm pretty sure that I told all the executives about this, so I wonder if this slipped out of Shion's memory?
Well, that was fitting for Shion.

"He was not defeated."

I corrected Shion's words for Benimaru's honor.
In my opinion, if you don't die, you win. In that regard, you could say that Benimaru won, though in reality, he just managed to keep the fight alive for as long as possible. If the fight had continued as it was, there was no doubt that Benimaru would have lost. Jahil was definitely a threat.

"I see, so then Luminas-sama, who defeated such an opponent, is stronger than Benimaru!"

That was it.
I had been wondering about that too.
No, actually, when comparing Luminas and Benimaru, I didn't think there was that much of a difference in strength in my opinion. That's why I had rushed to the scene thinking that Luminas and the others were in danger. I, too, wanted to hear about how Luminas fought off Jahil.

"Oh, you mean that," Luminas began to speak casually.

"You know, I've had the experience of my city being destroyed by an evil dragon---"

*Badump?!*

I felt like I had heard this story somewhere...no, rather, I had received many complaints about it...

"When building a city, the first priority is to ensure safety."

"I-I see. What an excellent idea..."

My tone became unintentionally polite, but I had no hesitation in choosing flattery here.
Luminas gave me a cold look, then continued the conversation as if she had calmed down a bit.

"I had set up several layers of 'Barriers' to counter any evil dragons, and they worked well."

Now that she mentioned it, I remember that there were indeed many layers of 'Defense Barriers' in this sacred place. We had been allowed to pass, but no one suspicious could get through.

"I didn't expect him to be that powerful. Jahil had the power to overwhelm Benimaru, and he seemed able to control his Ultimate Skill. Well, not as much as Veldora, but I didn't think a half-hearted 'Barrier' would work," I expressed my true feelings.

"Don't underestimate me!" Luminas snickered. "Unlike other places, this is a sacred land where my believers gather. With an unlimited outpouring of faith, it is easy to repel Jahil's power."

Her words were confident, and in fact, the results proved to be true.
But was it really that easy?

![break]

<<Applying the 'Secret of Faith and Grace' could theoretically be possible, so--->>

![break]

So, Luminas had refined the theory until it became a reality.
It's so impressive that it's scary. I can't even imagine how hard that would be for me.

![break]

<<It is not a task that can be done by an individual alone. It is necessary to know the hearts of believers and to understand each other. It is not possible to achieve this overnight, but do you also wish to achieve this, Master?>>

![break]

Hmm, I wonder?
It's not just my problem...
For now, let's put it on hold.
Ciel-san seems to be satisfied with my answer.

In fact, there are many other projects that have remained untouched, though they seem to be useful in many ways. Moreover, we are still in the middle of a war, so I cannot afford to face the residents of our country right now.
I put the matter on hold for the time being, as it was an issue to be dealt with in the future.


![soft scene break]


All right, I found out why Luminas was able to survive the crisis, but that doesn't mean the problem is solved.
On the contrary, the real work is yet to come.

"So then, Dagruel has defected. He is currently on the march, so I think we'll be in contact with him within a week at the latest."

I told Luminas the truth. I mentioned that Dagruel's brother Fenn had done something to him, and that he had turned into a different person.
I didn't actually see him in person, and I only learned about it from Ultima's report, but from a distance, Dagruel certainly appeared to be cloaked in a sinister haki. The army of giants who followed Dagruel also seemed ominous, so I expected that the battle would be quite fierce when the time came to fight.

Jahil was like the opener, and Dagruel was the main event. They were marching on foot, but it would not take them long to reach this point, judging from the way they were pushing forward through the Desert of Death without any difficulty.
Frankly speaking, Dagruel's defection hurt. I had envisioned this as a possibility, but when it actually became a reality, it was just too much of a headache.

"Well, Dagruel and I have been on bad terms for a long time. It's not just because of conflicting interests, but also because Dagruel and the Divine Ancestor were on good terms."

"Hey, hey, Jahil aside, is the discord with Dagruel because of the Divine Ancestor, too?!"

"Mm. Well, that matter is long over," Luminas said this without seeming to care.

Apparently, that was around the time when Dagruel was called an evil god. That's why Luminas didn't seem to care, but if that was the case, it felt to me that Dagruel was trying to settle his grudge right now...

"So, it's not surprising that we're going into a head-on war with him."

All that said, I think Dagruel is really strong.
At that level, perhaps even I would struggle with---

![break]

<<Hmph, that's not possible.>>

![break]

---Is what I think, but Ciel-san seems to have a different opinion.
Well, that's fine. I'm not going to argue about it here.
I don't want to be a fool who underestimates the enemy and loses, so I have to assume that the threat is at a level that I will have a difficult time and come up with countermeasures.

![break]

<<Understood.>>

![break]

I'm glad to hear that you agree.
Now then, let's think about what we should do.

Geopolitically speaking, the Holy Empire of Lubelius was the key to defending the western part of the country. If this place were to fall, the enemy would gain a foothold to the Western Nations, and the situation would fall into disarray.

The army of angels could fly, so there was no way to intercept them at any point. Fortunately, the army of giants was on foot. They were much faster than normal human walking, and perhaps because they used some kind of legion magic, their average speed was 30 kilometers per hour, which was unthinkable for a normal army, but it was still better than being attacked from the sky.

The distance from Dagruel's stronghold, the Holy Void Damargania, to here, the holy city of Rune, was about 2,000 kilometers in a straight line. Even if we assume that they do not bypass the Barren Lands and the Desert of Death, the distance is about 3,000 kilometers. Even by simple calculations, it would take more than four full days to complete the journey.
Since they would also need to rest and such, it would normally take more than three times as long...but from what I recall about the glimpses of their march, I had a feeling they would come here without rest.
In the meantime, I have been keeping an eye on them with the Argus spell. If there was any change, I should be able to detect it.

![break]

<<It is easy to deceive the surveillance magic 'Argus'. If the enemy is cautious, the possibility of countermeasures cannot be denied.>>

![break]

After all, that's correct.
'Argus' is a magic that allows you to see the situation of an area in real time, and there is no way to confirm if the scene has been tampered with.
Naturally, I also take countermeasures on the assumption that I am being watched. So, if the enemy can manipulate the same kind of magic, I should assume that they are taking countermeasures.
Of course, it might just be that I'm worrying too much...but either way, there is no doubt that we must not let our guard down.

I had other concerns.
The fact that Jahil was intercepted should not be taken at face value. One of the objectives of the mission had been to make Dagruel defect, so it would have been logical to attack Luminas from both sides if they wanted to take her down. The reason why they did not do so was probably because of Jahil's outburst.
There was a history with Luminas, and he may have had some kind of plan, but from what I heard, Jahil had been out of control. In other words, there may have been confusion in the enemy's chain of command.

Luminas possessed a considerable amount of power, but if she was sandwiched between an army of giants attacking from the west and an army of angels from the sky, even she would be helplessly overwhelmed.
It seemed inconsistent that the enemy did not do so.
In any case, since I had arrived in time, I wanted to make sure I was in the perfect position to intercept Dagruel's army before they arrived.
So then, how much could be afforded?

"Assuming that they maintain the current marching speed, it will be four days at the earliest before Dagruel's army arrives. Hinata and the others will be back soon, but just in time for the decisive battle, I guess."

"Hmmm. Worst case scenario, I should call Hinata back right away..."

"I was the only one who left Ingracia in a hurry, leaving the cleanup of the royal capital to them. They also have to escort important dignitaries from various countries, so I think it will be difficult until the handover is completed."

It was a good idea to call back not only Hinata but also the Holy Knight Order.
Masayuki was still in Ingracia, so it still wasn't safe. They may have defeated Feldway, but the next attack could be a full-scale one.
Well, Masayuki had Velgrynd-san, and Testarossa was still there. The Imperial soldiers also seemed surprisingly reliable, so the situation was probably better than ours and they should be able to withstand whatever happens.

"Hmm, that's right. Hinata represents the Western Holy Church, so it's not too much to ask," reluctantly, Luminas agreed with me.

If we selfishly called Hinata back at this point, it might be taken as a sign that the Holy Church had abandoned the Western Nations. If that happened, the trust we had built up would be lost all at once.
If things were really at their worst, it might be inevitable, but I was here to prevent that from happening.

"Well, I've brought my subordinate Gadra with me, so he should be discussing the defense with Adalmann by now. He's not as good as Hinata, but he's dependable, so I don't think you need to worry that much."

Luminas gave me an indignant glare as I said this.

"You are too carefree! It's probably because you don't understand the horror of Dagruel that you can speak so carelessly."

No, no, I think Dagruel is dangerous too.
It's just that Ciel-san seems to be in easy win mode, so I've been getting relaxed because I feel relieved.
I don't like to be called a carefree person, but I feel like I'll be a jerk if I talk back to her.
I swallowed my complaints in a mature manner and moved on to the next topic before I could receive any more criticism.

"Well, all that aside, let's check on our forces," I suggested.

Because it was the military secret of another country, I didn't expect her to honestly tell me everything. Even so, if I didn't ask, I couldn't make a proper strategy. So, I asked the most important question.

"Let me ask you frankly, how many Surmounters are there?"

This was quite rude, but it was the most important question. After all, since we could not rely on the Holy Knight Order's captains, I really wanted to get a grasp of the strength of our forces.
From this point onward, it would be better not to count those who were below A rank among the battle forces. Especially after observing Carrera and others, I even thought that it might be better not to bring them to the battlefield at all, as they could be wiped out by a single shot of large-scale magic.

As a matter of fact, the Holy Empire of Lubelius had announced the existence of a main force of Templar Knights as their defense force, consisting of knights who believed in Luminism. They numbered 10,000. They were, after all, the knights who protected the holy land, and were of a higher rank than those who had been dispatched to other countries. The combat ability of these knights was said to be at least B-plus rank at least.
However...

I felt bad to say it, but for me, they were only so-so^[Rimuru described them as "gojuppohyappo (五十歩百歩)" which is a shortened version of a Japanese idiom literally translating to "to laugh at a hundred steps after having gone fifty steps." It comes from a story where two people were running away, and the one who ran only 50 steps made fun of the person who went 100 steps even though they were both cowards who ran away. Basically, there's not much of a difference between them, so Rimuru is saying that the Templar Knights 'aren't that great' or are only 'so-so.'].
They were strong in the category of human beings, but I could only see a future in which they would be kicked out in front of Dagruel.
Of course, that depends on the strategy, but my character would not allow me to consider a soldier as a mere number.
This was not a game, and we should aim for zero casualties.
In that case, I wanted to have only the main force do the fighting, with the others assisting. I wanted them to fulfill their duty to protect the holy land as 'Barrier' maintenance personnel.

Luminas seemed to see through my thinking.

"Only seven are the most promising. The demon lord's army that was entrusted to my shadows established a ruling system of seven great nobles with Roy---no, Louis, as the supreme king."

Ah, this was more impressive than I expected.
I was surprised to hear that the Surmounter who was good friends with Vesta was one of those seven great nobles.
By the way, Gunther-san, the butler of Luminas, had not been included among those seven names.

"Gunther here is also one of the disciples of the Divine Ancestor. In a way, he and I are like brother and sister."

"I am deeply honored by your words. I, myself, am far behind Luminas-sama."

Luminas introduced me to Gunther-san, who was preparing another cup of tea. I knew him well, and I had also thought that he was quite strong, but hearing about who he really was convinced me.
He also told me that Louis was also a masterpiece of the Divine Ancestor. A masterpiece...I was a little skeptical about whether I could call it that or not.
He created them, but they escaped and became wild and rampant. I heard that they caused a lot of damage until Luminas defeated them and brought them under control.
Well, that was a long time ago, so I can't say anything about it now...but I've been told that it was one of the better incidents concerning the Divine Ancestor, so one could imagine how hard Luminas must've had to work.

Apparently the seven great nobles were descended from Louis. That's why, even for a demon lord's army, he was very proud.
In any case, the strength of the Luminas forces had now been clarified. Now it was my turn to disclose the information just reported to me.

"According to the information from Ultima, Dagruel's force is called the Chained Titan Army and consists of 30,000 Giant warriors. The average strength of the individual is about B-plus rank. Of course, the upper elites are all Over A rank, and it is said that there are nearly 1,000 such elite warriors alone."

"That's quite impressive" Luminas nodded at my report.

Luminas's statement here did not refer to the numerical difference between the 30,000 Chained Titan Army members and the 10,000 Templar Knight members, but only the numbers of the Over A rank warriors.
It is not clear why Dagruel was even bringing lower ranked warriors, but what should be emphasized is that quality is more important than quantity. I could be sure of this, as our country had overturned a disadvantage of numbers many times before.
So then, if we were to compare the quality...

Luminas's forces originally added up to 400 Bloody Knights, 300 Holy Knight Order members, and nearly 700 Over A rank members. Put that way, it would not have been too surprising to hear that the Dagruel side had nearly 1,000 members. However, since the Holy Knight Order was not present, there was no doubt that the Luminas side was at an overwhelming disadvantage.
If the Luminas side was defeated and the sacred lands were destroyed, the Western Nations would surely collapse. Not only would the object of faith be lost, but the existence of the guardian would also disappear, and the Western Nations would be completely overrun in less than a month.

If Dagruel's only objective was the territory, the destruction might be less severe. However, the people living there would suffer, and there was no telling how they would be treated.
At a time when our existence has been recognized, and we are about to join hands to create a prosperous and civilized society, being interfered with is out of the question. I would not allow anyone or anything to interfere with my self-indulgent life. Therefore, the defeat of the Luminas side had to be prevented.
In that case, the real question is whether the current strength of the Luminas side is enough.

Dagruel's strength was unknown. It would be dangerous to underestimate him, seeing as how he was said to be strong enough to fight with Veldora in the past. Ciel-san seemed certain that I would win...but I wasn't sure if I would be fighting or not, since I didn't know what would happen in the future. I needed to be prepared for all kinds of situations.

If he were to fight against Luminas, I wasn't sure who would win. Luminas also possesses the Ultimate Skill of the deadly sins series, so I don't think she would be defeated easily...but it's better to avoid a fight between leaders if at all possible.
With me here, there was no need to worry about it, but one should be aware of the strength of the adjutants in this case.


![soft scene break]


Luminas and Dagruel were said to have the largest factions among demon lords, but their overall strength seemed almost equal. That is probably why Dagruel had not made any rash moves, but now that the situation had come to this, the strength of the lieutenants and executives would determine the winner.
On the Luminas side, there were Gunther-san, Louis, and the seven nobles.

And of course, Dagruel had powerful beings on his side as well. Not to mention Dagruel's younger brothers such as Fenn and Glassord.
I had heard that there were those who were considered to be equivalent to the Demon Lord Seeds, though still one step inferior to Million-class beings. They were the Five Warrior Generals, the strongest among the senior fighters of the Chained Titan Army.
And the famous representative of this group was---

"It is troublesome that Fenn has returned. Dagruel will now revert to the ancient evil god, and the Four-armed Basara will be awakened."

---Yes, Four-armed Basara was the deputy commander of the Chained Titan Army. He was said to be as strong as the other deputy, Glassord, so he must be Million-class.

Still, there really were too many secret strongmen, considering those among the Luminas and Dagruel forces. I felt like questioning what the balance among demon lords really was, seeing how Karion and Frey were working under such a seemingly cute ferocious commander.
When I unintentionally complained in exasperation, Luminas answered me nonchalantly.

"Isn't it natural? After all, myself and the others have been demon lords since ancient times. We have taken in powerful people and expanded our power. To me, Karion and Frey were rather impressive as new demon lords."

This was a very superior sounding comment.
But in fact, the phrase "since ancient times" was very persuasive. After all, Luminas and Dagruel had been alive not within the span of one or two thousand years, but for thousands or even tens of thousands of years, if not more.
She explained that even if one could reach the Demon Lord Seed within a hundred or two hundred years, it was very rare to reach the level of Million-class. When she told me that, I had no words to reply.

"In that sense, you are an anomaly! Just how many million-class members do you have under your command? I would like to know what kind of trick you used to gather so many people in such a short period of time!!"

I was so surprised that an "Uh?!" slipped out of me.

Asking me how it happened...I don't understand it either, so I can't give an answer even if you ask me.
It seemed inconvenient for me to continue this conversation any further. So, I decided to ask Luminas about something that had been bothering me for a while, pushing that topic aside.

"By the way, you seem to know a lot about Dagruel's faction, but did you know about Fenn, Luminas?"

Luminas gave me an exasperated look, but still accepted my question.

"Nn? Of course. He was already sealed by the time I was born, but traces of the damage still remained. The Divine Ancestor used to tell me the story of those days with great pleasure. Besides, it is because of Fenn that the Divine Ancestor created the siblings Kisara and Basara."

Luminas said that Kisara and Basara were the progenitors of the giants, whom the Divine Ancestor created based on Dagruel and the True Giants. Because they were born as twins, they were said to have quarreled over who was the older sister or the older brother, and their quarrels were so fierce that the damage was considerable at that time.
Luminas argued that ultimately, "the source of all the disasters could be traced back to the Divine Ancestor".
The situation apparently calmed down when Kisara and Basara fought against Dagruel, lost, and then became his disciples.

"Indeed, poison was used to conquer poison, but it wasn't fun to see Dagruel's power grow."

It seems that after that, the situation turned into a power struggle with Luminas.
That situation changed when Dagruel and Kisara got married. It is often said that having a family settles things down, and apparently that was exactly the case.
That peaceful period continued for a while, but it was nothing more than a period of preparation for the next war... Peace and war repeated every hundred years or so according to the story.
Well, I'm not interested in that kind of history, so I asked her to explain it in pieces.

![break]

Kisara, the wife of Dagruel, died in childbirth.
Basara was very upset by the death of his twin sister, so they must have quarreled so much because they were that close. Well, I could only guess.
A devastated Basara was put under house arrest by Dagruel. Apparently, he was forced into sleep, but Luminas said that he was almost certainly awakened.
This was also mentioned in a report from Ultima.

<A long time ago, there was this troublesome brute known as the Four-armed. I asked about how he was doing, but it seems that he has been locked up the whole time. The old man^[Ultima calls Dagruel "ojisan" which most commonly means "uncle" but can also mean "old man" or "mister." You don't have to be someone's blood related uncle to be called that in Japan.] said he would send him out if necessary.>

Because of that, it was almost certain that he would appear as an enemy this time. Since Ultima said that he was troublesome, he must be a big deal.

So, the group led by Basara is the Five Warrior Generals whose members are decided by an annual competition to test their skills. However, the average lifespan of giants is only about 500 years, so it seems that members were only selected from amongst the ancient titans---high-ranking fighters with a lifespan of more than 1,000 years. It was said that young giants sometimes reincarnate as their ancestors, and this had become an annual event of national pride in Damargania.
Thus, the Five Warrior Generals might stand out, but they would not be as much of a threat as Basara, the leader of the group. I would definitely consider them lower in rank than the Beastketeers and the Two Wings. In other words, the Seven Great Nobles under Luminas were stronger.

Here is a summary of the forces on both sides.

![break]

First, Luminas's side:

Gunther and Louis are Million-class, and their existence value is a little over a million.
The Seven Great Nobles are equivalent to Demon Lord Seeds, and their existence values range from 200,000 to 600,000. There appears to be individual differences among them.

Additionally, there had been the Seven Luminary Clerics as a front force, but they had been wiped out due to a tragic incident. There was no time to replenish the champion class of the human race, so they would be reconstituted from the current Holy Knights in the future.
Well, that's about it.

![break]

Next, Dagruel's side:

There are Glassord and Fenn, Dagruel's younger brothers. Glassord's existence value is said to be less than 2 million, and Fenn's is even higher than Dagruel's. They appear to be ridiculously strong.
Basara, whom I mentioned earlier, is a little weaker than Glassord with a value a little higher than a million. He is almost on par with Gunther.

The remaining Five Warrior Generals seem to be in the range of 150,000 to 300,000. Their threat level is not as high as that of the Beastketeers, but the problem is that there are other high-level fighters to deal with. The total number of those fighters is close to a hundred, with the minimum existence value over 100,000, and the maximum value close to 150,000. This was not surprising as replacements had to be made in the annual competition. However, the fact that there were nearly a hundred such strong participants was a threat that could not be ignored.

![break]

I believe that quality is better than quantity, but it's troublesome when the number of participants exceeds the minimum threshold. It would be easier if we could land a first-strike victory, like with Velgrynd-san, but I don't think Dagruel would allow that...

"It's been a long time since I've felt threatened by numbers," I said.

"Well, I have always thought that I would be at a disadvantage in a full-scale war, despite being on the brink of one for a long time now. I had made preparations accordingly, but unfortunately our strength was greatly reduced by some slime."

"Wai---hey! That story is long over!"

Arguing with each other would not help to solve the problem.
At this point, I would have no choice but to send out reinforcements from Tempest... Just when I was thinking about that, Shion joined the conversation with a big smile on her face.

"Fufufu, Rimuru-sama. Dagruel is nothing to be afraid of!"

Shion stood up, then called out to the other side of the door.

"You guys, come in."

A group of nervous-looking men entered the room at Shion's call.
Hold on, these guys...

"It's been a long time! I am Dagura!"

"I am Liura."

"I'm Debura!"

I had left them with Shion and forgot about them, but they are Dagruel's sons. I mean, I did actually have them in the back of my mind, but since I had suddenly become enemies with Dagruel, I hadn't really thought about what to do with them...

"Yeah, it's been a while. It's good to see that you're doing well, but are you guys aware of the current situation?"

If they wanted to go back to Dagruel, we should send them away without taking them prisoner.
To tell the truth, they are stronger than Demon Lord Seeds individually, so it would be troublesome for them to become the enemy's strength...but if we take them as prisoners, we would have to devote our forces to guard them, which could cause unnecessary confusion.
Killing an unarmed opponent was out of the question, and I didn't have any other good ideas. There was also a possibility of isolating them in Ramiris' labyrinth, but that would increase the burden on Ramiris' group, so it was safer not to do that.
As I pondered this, I waited for a reply from the three of them. Then, I received an unexpected answer.

"Of course. Our father has switched sides, it's so shameful."

"We had also heard about Uncle Fenn from bedtime stories, but we never thought that he would be revived in this era."

"Heheh, he was so diabolical, and he seems to have been on par with our father."

Surprisingly, they were speaking as if on our side.
So I decided to ask them.

"Uh, we're going to war with your father, are you going to be okay?"

"Yes, we are. There are a few concerns, but rather than that, we're more interested in testing how strong we have become now."

"It's just as my elder brother said. We are trained by Shion-sama every day. Mental and physical training and good food. What's more, we even have friends with whom we engage in friendly competition. Defeating those who try to destroy this environment must be the reason why we gained this power!"

"Heheh, we're all rather happy to be able to show off the results of our training. I'm going to use this power of mine as well and beat my uncle and the others to a pulp!!"

The three of them were all insisting in unison. They seemed to really mean what they said and were prepared to fight against Dagruel and the others.
When I looked at Shion, she nodded her head with a look of satisfaction on her face, as if it was only natural.

"Uh..."

Well, what should we do?
Is it really okay to send these three men off to war?

![break]

<<I think there's no problem.>>

![break]

As I was wondering what to do, Ciel-san answered without a moment's pause.
But what about the possibility of their betrayal?
I believed their words to be true, but if they were fake, it would put our allies in danger. Some of the others might even feel reluctant to fight alongside the sons of the enemy leader.
However, Ciel-san's attitude was unwavering.

![break]

<<I think that is highly unlikely. Because--->>

![break]

I didn't even need to hear the answer.
The door to the room opened and Shion's men rushed in.
Then, a stern-faced older brother was the first to express his opinion to me.

"Rimuru-sama, we believe in Dagu-chi^[A cutesy nickname for Dagura. -chi is kind of like adding -chan to a name. Similar to how Elmesia calls Rimuru "Rimu-chi"] and the others!"

*Huh, Gobzo...?*

I almost mistook him for someone else because of the unusually fearless expression on his face. His appearance was the same, but his aura was different. And then there were his words about believing in Dagura and the others.
Gobzo was not the only one.
Shion's subordinates, the Yomigaeri, began to verbally defend Dagura and the others.
It was proof that they sincerely believed in them.
Or rather, perhaps they were worried that I was going to dispose of or confine Dagura and the others.

That's slightly disturbing.
I'm a rational thinker, but it's not like I would have taken their lives out of the blue just because I was worried that they might become my enemies...

"Rimuru-sama! As you can see, our unity is solid. We are not trained to be soft, so we won't be shaken by the slightest thing!!"

Shion herself, perhaps feeling responsibility as the one in charge of Dagruel's sons, looked me straight in the eyes and advised me.
That was enough for me, but then Luminas made a surprising statement.

"Rimuru, I must confess that even I have a desire to get rid of Dagruel's sons---"

*No, I don't have any such feelings...* is what I was about to say, but Luminas quickly continued.

"---But I think we can believe them."

She was known to be on bad terms with Dagruel, so this was an unexpected defense.
I asked her in detail how she had come to this conclusion.
Then Luminas told me with a bitter look on her face.

"The improvement of Shion's cooking was only possible with their help."

"And, what does that mean?"

"Who do you think tasted it? I disliked it, but there are curious people everywhere. One of the Seven Great Nobles foolishly came forward and had to spend a month in bed."

Apparently, he had thought it would be all right because the undead don't die, but he was wrong.
That guy is an idiot...is what I thought, but I was hesitant to say it out loud. After all, wonderful inventions and discoveries are always made by those kinds of challengers.
I think the first people to eat sea urchin and sea cucumber were amazing. They were said to have been forced to eat them as some kind of punishment, but in the end, those actions contributed tremendously to the future of gastronomy.
In that sense, one could say that the noble had acted courageously.
So, I nodded lightly and urged Luminas to continue.

"After that, no one wanted to taste the food, but those three were the ones who stepped forward. Everyone was so moved by their generosity, that even my subordinates had no choice but to acknowledge Dagura and the others."

I see, so that's how it was.
It seems that behind Shion's culinary progress was a hidden story of unimaginable hardship.
Incidentally, Adalmann had been famously quoted for saying, "I never thought I would be thankful for not being able to eat." Seriously, thank you everyone. I was truly thankful from the bottom of my heart.

"Well, if it means eating our madame's home-cooked meals, then I think we are the ones most suitable for the job."

"Big brother is correct."

"It's a reward!"

Yeah.
These three are probably just crazy.
But still, all is well if the result is good, and if Dagura and the others could avoid any discord, then they would be a force to be reckoned with.

"Then, myself or Luminas will take care of Dagruel, and Fenn will be left to Shion and the others."

"Hmph! I will deal with Dagruel. To be honest, it's a bit tough, but it will be easy enough just to buy time."

From Luminas perspective, she did not seem to think that she could beat Dagruel.
In other words, from a strategic viewpoint, they should challenge and defeat all the enemy leaders in battle while Luminas is holding back Dagruel.
In that case, if I were to be Fenn's opponent, we would have even more leeway in terms of strength.

"Okay, in that case---"

That's when it happened.
Just as I was about to say the words "I think I see a way to win," the situation suddenly changed.


![soft scene break]


The news came via an emergency Telepathy Net from Ramiris.

<Hey Rimuru, we're in trouble!>

<You know, you're always talking about troubling things are, but I'm going through a lot right now too, you know?>

I tried to let it go lightly, but this time there really was trouble.

<This is no time for jokes! You know, I've lost contact with Milim's forces. I ordered for it to be investigated immediately, but I have a really bad feeling about this!!>

Ramiris spoke.
Just a few minutes ago, Gobta and the others returned and reported that they had succeeded in defeating Zelanus. However, the problem happened right after that. Suddenly, the video monitoring the war situation stopped working. Fortunately, the portal remained connected to the site. Gobta and the others were urgently sent back to investigate the situation, and Ramiris being Ramiris, contacted me right away.

<This is bad.>

<That's why I said so!>

Good grief, this is truly what it means to have no time to relax.
I don't think Milim has anything to do with it, but I do have an idea regarding the video interference.

![break]

<<It must be Velzard.>>

![break]

Ciel-san agrees with me.
If so, then I can be sure with almost no doubts.

<Tell Gobta and the others not to overdo it. I'll be back soon.>

I told that to Ramiris and ended the conversation. Then, I turned to Luminas.

"Sorry. There's been an emergency."

"What's going on?"

"Most likely, Milim and Velzard-san have gotten into a fight. I need to contact Guy, so I'm going to head back."

When I told her that, Luminas nodded her head in agreement.

"Okay. We'll be ready for Dagruel here, so don't worry."

"That's right! Let's just show them that we can defeat those giants on our own!!"

Luminas assuaged my fears by assuring me that everything would be fine. And even Shion assured me that they wouldn't have any problems on their own.
I couldn't take their words at face value, but I felt like I could trust them for the time being until we worked out a countermeasure.

"Well then, I'm going back."

"Yes, leave the rest to us!"

Oh, I just remembered. I should tell her about this possibility, too.

"Luminas, just to let you know, don't be overconfident about the four-day grace period."

The earliest that the Dagruel forces could expect to reach the area was four days. However, that was only if they maintained the current speed of march. There might be someone like me who can transport the whole army, so we needed to be cautious about that.

"Mm, that's right. I had also considered that possibility. In fact, you yourself are able to do so. It would be negligent of a commander to think that the enemy is unable to do what we can."

Ah, I see that she understood me. In that case, I have nothing more to say.
I could rush to their aid if the need arose, so it was time to deal with more important matters first.

"All right, take care."

"You too."

Luminas and I nodded to each other.

"Good luck, Rimuru-sama!"

With the support of Shion and the others, I returned to Tempest once again.


![soft scene break]


As soon as I returned, I went straight to the Control Room.
And then, I was shocked to witness such an astonishing scene.
Not good...

Really, really not good.
On the image projected on the big screen, I saw Milim who was so furious, that she had lost her sense of reason. She had transformed into a strange form and was going on a rampage.
Her opponent was Velzard.

She was a bewitching beauty with a smiling face, but she was not backing down from Milim, who had become a "destroyer" in the truest sense of the word. They were fighting each other evenly.
Both of them.
It was truly the return of the battle of the gods.

"What's going on here?" I muttered to myself, and Ramiris answered without a pause.

"It's a good thing that Gobta is filming!"

No, that's not what I'm asking...

"I'm asking you what the situation is!"

"Ah, that's right. As you can see, it's the worst!"

Mhm, now I understand that Ramiris is completely useless.
It was Benimaru who stood up from the luxurious commander's seat and welcomed me, explaining to me as I let out a sigh of exasperation.

"We were all excited about the defeat of Zelanus, but suddenly we lost contact. I sent Gobta, who had just returned, to scout the area. It was confirmed that Velzard-sama and Milim-sama were in combat."

Benimaru told me the story straight to the point. The battlefield was completely covered, a frosty world of pure white ice, devoid of any signs of life.

Ranga, who was with Gobta, had been trying to collect any scent particles using 'Wind Manipulation' in order to help us understand the situation. As it turned out, all the smells had disappeared.
In other words, although the visual information showed that the people had turned into ice statues, it was safe to assume that the entire battlefield was in the same situation.

"I would have liked to check on the ice sculptures, but even with Gobta being protected by Ranga, it was difficult, or rather, impossible to approach them."

"Is it really that bad?"

"Yes. This video was also shot from the maximum possible approaching distance. Gobta whined about it, but I told him to be brave and do his best."

In Benimaru's case, I think he's like a real demon, not just in spirit, although now is not the time to be speaking so casually.
Carrera and her subordinates are still there, but I can't get through to them with 'Telepathy Net'. We are supposed to be connected by the Soul Corridor.
Everyone on the battlefield is either dead or alive. Indeed, this is certainly the worst possible situation.
I didn't want to think that Carrera and the others were dead. Besides, Karion and Frey-san must have been there as well.
There were so many Million-class members there, it was unthinkable that they could all be wiped out in such a short period of time without being able to do anything. If there had been an emergency, we had all agreed to stall for time.

And yet, here we are.
Although it wasn't clear in the video, it looked like Milim had gone out of control. She seemed to be unleashing an abnormal level of power and having a big fight with Velzard...
I wondered what could have caused that...

I can't get the bad image out of my mind.
However, being stuck in the moment would not solve anything.
It's no wonder Ramiris was completely overwhelmed, but I couldn't let that happen to me either.
The battlefield must be a hell of a mess. I made up my mind and changed my mindset.

What should we do now?
There was no point in panicking.
In such a situation, I should think about what I can do now.
Keep my mind calm and collected. I should think of countermeasures one by one, and deal with them as best I can.

"All remaining members of the Dungeon's Elite Ten are to be summoned. Gobta and the others should return as well, as it will be too dangerous."

"But..."

"I don't think the battle between Milim and Velzard-san will be settled that easily. At present, only Veldora and I are capable of dealing with a rampaging Milim, right?"

To be honest, I don't like it either.
I mean, if Milim really goes out of control, would anyone really be able to stop her?
I heard that Ramiris interceded a long time ago when she clashed with Guy...but I can't expect much from Ramiris nowadays.
However, in the hope for that near-zero possibility:

"Hey Ramiris...just a question, but do you think you can bring Milim back to her senses while I'm holding Velzard-san back?"

"Hey! You, are you telling me to die?!"

I knew it.
I was thinking this solution would be impossible, and I didn't expect anything from the beginning, but now I had confirmation.
For Ramiris, who had become a little kid, this was too much to handle.

"No, I was thinking it would be impossible. But I just didn't expect them to come up with a plan to drive Milim out of control..." I muttered and let out a sigh.

While Benimaru and the others were busy gathering the executives, I had to think about our next move.
To be honest, I never expected this.
It was bad enough to have a traitor among our own comrades, but to think that there was an even greater calamity waiting for us.
No, I was well aware that it was an effective method, but I didn't expect things to end up this way...

![break]

<<...If Milim really goes out of control, there is a possibility that the world will collapse. This is a forbidden strategy that does not concern friend or foe, and if they are willing to do this without any hesitation, we need to be prepared for a more serious situation.>>

![break]

...What does that mean?

![break]

<<Unleashing the World-destroying Dragon Ivarage is the most likely scenario, but we should also be on the lookout for other dangerous means.>>

![break]

In other words, anything goes, no rules.
It's really the worst.
Bringing a rampaging Milim back to her senses was already a difficult challenge on its own, let alone with Velzard-san interfering with it. I thought about asking Veldora for help, but as soon as Velzard-san's image appeared on the monitor, he suspiciously remembered something he had to do and ran away.
That guy, he truly is unreliable when it matters most...

Well, it's the same for me, so I have no right to complain.
If I could escape, I would run away as fast as possible.

However, this was no exaggeration, and could possibly lead to the destruction of mankind.
To be honest, I felt troubled by it.
Even if I alone survived, it would mean nothing.
It was better to resist with all my might than to tolerate such a future.
It's time to stop whining.
I decided to switch my mindset to think seriously about the countermeasures from here on out.


![soft scene break]


Before the executives gathered, I had one more thing to do.
That is, to summon a powerful helper.

<And so, I'm requesting immediate support.>

<Understood, Rimuru-sama! Guy-sama seemed reluctant to do so, but please leave it to me, Raine, to negotiate the situation.>

Yes, it was Guy whom I was trying to call.
In all honesty, no matter how hard I try, it is impossible for me to deal with Velzard and Milim at the same time.
You can't win a war with just mentality.
I had no intention of entering a fight that I could not win, and if I had no choice but to do so, I would not spare any effort to improve my chances of winning.

And so, I tried to connect 'Telepathy Net' to Guy but was rejected.
Did he get fed up after sensing the battle between Velzard and Milim?
No, I don't think so.
Unlike Veldora, Guy understands what has to be done.
In other words, he thinks that there is a more serious threat than this.

The fact that Ciel-san and Guy came to the same conclusion was depressing me.
The problems just keep piling up.
Even if I involve Guy and he can deal with Velzard-san, Milim will inevitably be left with me. Even though I could see the path up to that point, I had no plan beyond that, which was the cause of my uneasiness.
I could just manage to fight.
However...

It would be difficult for me to deal with Milim without affecting this planet, let alone the ground.
Probably, it would be all I could do not to die.
Well, even if I die, I can come back as long as Veldora is around, but if I retire, Guy's burden will increase, and then he'd be out of the game.
No matter how strong Guy is, it would be impossible for him to fight against both of them at the same time. In the first place, the planet itself would likely be destroyed if he didn't deal with it well...

It's dangerous no matter how you look at it.
In addition to this, there was Feldway, Ivarage, and so on... Even though we had defeated Michael, it was just too many problems one after another.
Now then, even if I really try to think of countermeasures, I can't help but fill my mind with unpleasant imaginations.
While I was pondering this, I received a reply from Raine.

<Rimuru-sama, it's perfect! Guy-sama also heard my request--->

<Hey, Rimuru. Why are you using my Raine as your lackey?>

Uh?!
Needless to say, it was Guy who interrupted the 'Telepathy Net' from Raine.
He didn't seem to understand why Raine and I were getting along so well, but of course there was a reason for this.
I had recognized Raine's talent as a painter and began to make various requests for my personal use.

Raine had responded to my requests with great pleasure, and now she had established herself as my personal painter.
To be more specific, I became her patron and helped Raine's talent to flourish.
As to how the relationship ended up like this...it happened after the meeting at Leon's castle.

After the meeting, I was also shown the paintings that had been confiscated from Diablo.
As it turned out, the paintings that Raine had done were very beautiful.
Just like a photograph...

Raine depicted a wide variety of expressions in her paintings simply by spreading the wings of her imagination without the use of models.
Among them---that's right!
There were nudes as well.
As for me, I was obviously quite interested in them.
From an artistic point of view, of course.
The pursuit of beauty has no limits, and my desire for it knows no bounds.

I had no guilty feelings at all, but purely out of intellectual curiosity as a person who pursued beauty, I just happened to ask her a question: "Raine, can you paint nudes without a model?"

Then Raine replied to my innocent inquiry.
"It's expensive," she said.

It wasn't a matter of whether she could do it or not, but a matter of expense.
Discreetly, I held out the bag of gold coins.
Raine quickly tucked it into her pocket without raising an eyebrow. On top of that, without losing her calm demeanor, she went on about how, "Gold coins are nonsense to a demon. However, I respect Rimuru-sama, so..." and so on and so forth.

I thought to myself, this was only the beginning of an advanced level of psychological warfare.
And so, I asked her "What is it that you want?" and pressed on.

![break]

<<...It was not advanced at all, nor was anything even implied. Rather, it was a direct--->>

![break]

W-well, ignoring the outsider's intrusion and proceeding with the discussion, Raine's answer was as follows.

"I'm interested in points," she appealed to me, looking at me with pure eyes.

From there, let's just say that it was easy to win her over.
I had numerous personal meetings with Raine. After that, I became her patron and began supporting her artistic endeavors.
If Ciel-san had performed the memory save in my brain, I might not have been so enthusiastic about it. However, since it was not cooperative in the most crucial moments, I found my way through it with Raine's paintings.

![break]

<<...Tch.>>

![break]

Hm?
I thought I heard something like a click of the tongue, but... No, no, it must have been my imagination.
I'm a little tired, so it must have been an auditory hallucination.
Because I have no sense of remorse.

![break]

<<I don't understand why so many of them use nudity as a motif.>>

![break]

N-no way, Ciel-san?!
There's no way that something Ciel-san doesn't know about exists in this world.
So it must just be my imagination!
And with that, this story is over!!

![break]

Thus, the relationship between Raine and I became close, and now she was working for me as an outside collaborator.
It was natural for Guy to be suspicious, but I didn't owe him any explanations.
That's why, I responded to him with a firm voice.

<Now is not the time! This is an emergency, so come over here right now. As soon as possible!!>

With that said, I ended the 'Telepathy Net' with Guy.

![break]

The painting I asked Raine to do of Hinata has not yet been finished. I cannot allow this world to be destroyed before I see it.
I vowed once again to do everything in my power to overcome this crisis.^[Yes, you did just read all that.]


![soft scene break]


Within five minutes of me giving the order to Benimaru, everyone had assembled.
Benimaru was standing tall as the commander---as for Diablo, he was participating with such poise that there wasn't even the faintest sign of fatigue from the previous day.
Gobta, who had just been recalled from scouting because of the danger, was shivering in his seat. He could have rested, but he had a strong sense of responsibility.
Speaking of which, Ranga had already retreated into my shadow. Even if it might be cheating, I thought he was cute in that way. I hoped he would take a good rest after the hardships he suffered.

On that note, Geld was in the emergency room with serious injuries. Although he was no longer seriously injured, he was so worn out that the recovery medicine could not keep up with his condition, so he was taken to the rarely used recreation facility.
Gabil, who was accompanying Geld, was also hospitalized urgently upon Shuna's decision.
Apparently, his condition had been worse than it looked, and it seems that he had been on the brink of death.
The unexpected pitfall of recovery medicine was that it made users look healthier than they were because it removed injuries.

To a monster, magicules were equivalent to life force. If the magicules were exhausted, the monster could lose its life.
For me, that was not a funny story, because I had been in such situations multiple times when Naming. I had to force Gabil, who was planning to attend the meeting, to take a rest.
There was another seriously injured person.

Leon.
Diablo had brought him to the medical facility, and he was in stable condition. Shuna reported that he would wake up soon. As one would expect from a former hero and a current demon lord, the recovery rate of his physical strength was quite fast.

I was hoping he would join the meeting when he woke up, but I couldn't force him to do so. Unfortunately, since we couldn't afford to wait for Leon's recovery, he would not be participating in the meeting this time.

The rest of the labyrinthine forces participating were Kumara, Zegion, and Apito.
Adalmann's group was participating in the defense of Lubelius with Shion, and Master Gadra had also joined them. Since the Dragon King team did not participate in such cases, everyone was here.

By the way, Hakurou was continuing his training as a bodyguard for the children. Sare and Grigori also remained in training. Sare seemed to be a head above the rest, while Grigori appeared to be a good match for the children.
The reason why Hakurou was not invited was so as not to worry the children.

Chloe had come to my rescue under the false pretense of being sick, but now she was actually sick. That was one of the reasons why I was trying not to make Kenya and the others feel uneasy.
In any case, I placed them on a secure floor so that they could be safe even if enemies were to invade the labyrinth. But even so, I couldn't take any chances.
In that sense, Kumara was going to join the children as soon as I finished leaving my message.

Besides, there was another reason.
Momiji and Alvis had also taken refuge in this labyrinth.
Kaede-san had also come to accompany them. She was the perfect person for the job, as she had experience in childbirth and was acquainted with pregnant women. Upon Kaede-san's strong request, Hakurou had been assigned to guard Benimaru's wives so that Benimaru could concentrate on the battle.

With this, all the members had now assembled, though I felt uneasy seeing as there were so few of us. It was no wonder as they were scattered all over the place, but with Carrera's safety still unknown, it was only natural to feel an unprecedented sense of crisis.
In any case, I have to swallow such anxieties and behave myself with dignity just like Benimaru.

We decided to start the discussion in the conference room adjacent to the Control Room so that we could be notified immediately if something happened all while keeping a close watch on the situation.
Or rather, this was not the time to be having a leisurely meeting, so I was going to formulate a strategy on my own. Unfortunately, the battle was still raging, and the earth was trembling.

Most likely, the Kingdom of Ingracia was also experiencing earthquakes.
If this continued, it would cause damage not only on a continental scale, but also on a planetary scale. In order to prevent this from happening, I was going to ask for forgiveness for my selfishness this time.

The conclusion I had come to, that Guy and I would go out and do something about it, could only be described as a haphazard, reckless, and unplanned strategy.
However, even my reliable partner Ciel-san couldn't come up with a better strategy, so I had no choice but to quietly give in.

![break]

"Everyone, thank you for gathering here," I greeted them and then went straight to the main topic.

"As for how to deal with Milim, I will go."

When I made that declaration, the room became tense.
It was understandable. For the leader to make a move all on their own was essentially a bad plan.
It was more common in my case, but it was still unusual for me to skip even a discussion in this way, so I guess everyone had their own opinions on the matter.

"Kufufufu... Well then, I will accompany Rimuru-sama..." Diablo offered.

"No, you are certainly strong, but you can't hold back against Milim, can you?" I rebuked him. "I'm sure a more suitable opponent will appear, so at that time, show me your skills to your heart's content."

I refused it.
No matter what anyone says, this was the decision. If we were going to fight against Milim or Velzard, hitting them with large numbers would only increase the casualties.

![break]

<<...When it comes to an opponent of that level, there is no one we can count as a fighting force.>>

![break]

Ciel-san was of the same opinion.
It assured me that Benimaru, Zegion, and even Diablo would be useless. It said that although it was only a possibility, the risk of death was very high.
It might be possible if they were facing Milim with the intent to kill, but not if we were only trying to stop her.
In that case, I had no choice but to do my best.
Then, I called out to Guy who had come all this way.

"Sorry, but I'll be needing Guy's company."

"...Ah?"

Guy was staring at me, but I was not one to be intimidated by such things.
Compared to facing this extremely dangerous arbitration all alone, it was much better to persuade Guy here.

"After all, Guy-san is the leader of the Octagram, right? As the newcomer here, I think there's no choice but to ask my very reliable senior to go and help---"

The plan was to butter up Guy and get him involved. It would increase the probability of success, so I'll apologize in advance.
Guy, however, interrupted me with a grim look on his face.

"You called me over here and now you want me to help you? You've got some nerve, you know that?"

"No, no, no, it's because I'm a chicken, so I want Guy to help me. It's not a joke, I'm asking you seriously."

Here, I bowed my head and asked Guy to help me so that he would understand how I truly felt.
Seeing this, Guy's attitude also shifted.
Then, he began to speak to me in a serious tone.

"Do you understand? While I understand that you are worried about Milim and the others---"

Hmmm, it seems that Guy had come to the same conclusion as Ciel-san.
Rather than mediating the battle between Milim and Velzard, I guess this was a matter of priority. The more I thought about it, the more depressing it became, but I just couldn't shake the conclusion that we should be dealing with what we could for now.

"Are you talking about the possibility of Ivarage being unleashed? I'm certainly worried about that too, but if this world is destroyed before that happens, it will be the end either way."

I said this to Guy, trying not to let his intimidation get the better of me, as if to show my resolve.

"...So, you noticed that."

Guy said this in an uninterested manner and sat down silently.
For the time being, he seems to have decided to wait for my reaction.
Luckily, I decided to take advantage of this and proceed with my story.

"Actually, I don't understand what Velzard's purpose is. I don't think that her intention was really to enrage Milim into a rampage."

Making her lose control is a means to an end, so what does Velzard want to do beyond that?
If we can understand that, there might be a way to do something about it, but...

Now is not the time to dwell on it.
In order to save Carrera and the others, there is no choice but to put my worries behind me.
As I was thinking about this, Guy muttered something to me.

"Most likely, Velzard wants to see me in earnest."

"Huh?"

"She wants the same thing she's always wanted. She wants to prove that she's better than me in a serious fight."

"Uh...?"

I wondered just what he was saying all of a sudden, and when I looked at Guy, I saw that he had a very serious expression on his face.
Apparently, it was a sincere statement.

*That's why I didn't want to deal with it.* Guy looked uncomfortable.

I can't believe this world is about to be destroyed over this kind of a lover's quarrel...

I was baffled, but I couldn't just leave it at that.

"Even if that's true, this planet will be shattered if they keep on fighting. We have no choice but to stop it."

"They're trying to call us there, you know? Feldway's plan will fail if we don't go, so isn't that the best thing to do?"

According to Guy, this planet could not be destroyed because it was created by Veldanava's power. However, Milim's power was still increasing, so if things were left as is, the planet would be contaminated by magicules.
Even so, perhaps I should be grateful that the planet would not shatter.

Thinking about it, it was only natural to think that magic like Carrera's should not be invoked on a planet. It was precisely because it was in this world that it had been able to withstand such a drastic power. Otherwise, the earth's axis would have been distorted even if we were lucky.
Guy's argument made sense when he explained it like that.

If we joined in the battle, it would be just as Feldway intended, and we might even end up summoning Ivarage if we weren't careful. I was convinced that Guy's decision was correct if he wanted to avoid such a risk.
However, even so...

I nodded involuntarily, but that option was long gone.

"Unfortunately, Carrera and the others have also been turned into ice sculptures, so I can't just leave them alone."

Carrera was not the only one.
Frey-san, Karion, and the others who had been fighting there had to be rescued, or else we would never be able to live together in a world where we can all smile.
That is why my determination would not waver.

"Tch, I get it. It can't be helped, so I'll go with you," Guy said and stood up as if in exasperation.


![soft scene break]


"I think you're aware, but if we get too serious, the area contaminated by magicules will increase. You have to be very careful, okay?"

Uh, that's my line.

"You're the one who's already messed up once, so be careful."

"That's right! I can't help you this time, so don't do anything rash!"

*I'm worried about you guys being on your own,* is what Ramiris said among other things, but it was an inexplicable feeling.
But well, I'm not qualified to talk big either.
It's kind of funny to me that I have no plan so far, but it couldn't be helped.
Now was the time to be strong.
Also, I had experienced similar situations many times before.

"So with that, Guy and I are the only ones who are going to stop Milim. I would like you all to defend the base and respond to requests for help from other countries."

I was only informing them of the decision this time, so some of them might be dissatisfied. However, this was the best solution that I had decided after consulting with Ciel-san.

"Rimuru-sama, after all, even if it's just me accompanying---"

"Denied."

I turned down Diablo's proposal without hesitation.

If it's Diablo, he would have been able to handle our fight. Even so, I turned him down because I wanted him to stay behind in case of any unforeseen circumstances.

"Reviving Ivarage doesn't seem to be Feldway's only goal. I think Dagruel's attack on Luminas is also to get us to use our strength as a diversion. The only ones who can take care of things if I'm out of action are you, Benimaru, and Zegion."

Diablo is a reliable guy, but that's why I wanted him to stay. The enemy still had not just Feldway, but also the insectar king, Zelanus...

As long as the labyrinth remained safe, we would not be defeated in the truest sense of the word. Unless all three of them remained here, I would feel uneasy.
Benimaru had the important role of commanding the team.
Zegion was trusted as the guardian of the labyrinth.
Benimaru's command and Zegion's strength, combined with the environment of the labyrinth, would surely be able to withstand an opponent like Zelanus. In addition, with Diablo's uncanny ability to respond, I was inclined to believe that they would be able to cope even if the enemy launched an all-out attack on the labyrinth.
Thus, I forced my way to convince the three of them.
And Veldora, too.

"What about me?"

"Secret Weapon-san (Veldora) is truly the last line of defense."

Veldora seemed to be dissatisfied with not being called by name, but he nodded his head in satisfaction after hearing what I said.
I've said it many times, but as long as Veldora is safe, I can be revived.
I don't really want to try it, but there is a big difference between having insurance and not having insurance.
I had suppressed the opposition with my own dogmatic and prejudiced opinion, so I decided to go out to battle immediately.
The more time I spent, the less likely I was to decide, so I left the rest to Veldora.

"I'm counting on you, Veldora!"

"Mm, leave it to me."

Seeing Veldora nodding his head, he gave off a reliable feeling.
Ramiris jumped towards me.

"Rimuru, please help Milim!!"

"Yeah, leave it to me!"

To reassure the anxious Ramiris, I smiled and promised to bring Milim back to her senses.
Half-hearted measures wouldn't work against the strongest demon lord Milim, so I hoped that my voice would reach her. If she could control her anger, she would naturally come to her senses.
As a matter of fact, there was quite a bit of luck riding on all of this.

Guy holding Velzard at bay was a prerequisite. Then, we had to be prepared for a long battle while making adjustments to minimize the impact on the planet.
It was an unprecedented act of recklessness.
To begin with, facing Milim in a rampaging state while holding back is an act of suicide...

I assured Diablo that it was impossible, but even I was not so sure of myself.
However, there was no choice but to do it.

"Benimaru, I'll leave the rest to you."

"Rest assured!"

I was glad Benimaru was here.
We needed to be prepared for the requests from other countries, especially Lubelius which was in a war situation. There was no way to know what would happen next. The situation was changing every moment, and we would have to properly respond flexibly while distributing the remaining forces.
Only Benimaru could be entrusted with such difficult adjustments.
I nodded back at Benimaru.

![break]

Well then...

*Just wait, Milim! Don't go on a huge rampage and cause any more damage!*

Let's wake Milim up before it's too late.
With everyone's anxious gazes upon us, and carrying too many expectations, Guy and I left the scene.


![hard scene break]


After Rimuru and Guy left, there was a heavy atmosphere in the conference room.

"This is the first time I've ever felt so impotent," Diablo muttered.

Those words represented the sentiments of everyone present.

"That's for sure. I was told that I had an important role to play in analyzing the war situation and taking command, but I would have been happy to serve as Rimuru-sama's escort, even if it meant throwing that all away."

Benimaru also spoke honestly.
He could not strongly oppose Rimuru's decision because he thought it was the right choice, but in all honesty, Rimuru was more important to him than his comrades.
This time had been different than usual.

Rimuru, who was always so easy-going, had been unusually nervous.
He seemed to have been hiding it so as not to make everyone uneasy, but it was obvious to Benimaru, who had known him for a long time.
Just that was enough to infer how bad the situation was.

"I never intended to, but I guess I was still being coddled by Rimuru-sama..."

"Yes. If that is what Rimuru-sama wishes, then I have no choice but to comply, though it is vexing that I cannot be trusted to hold myself back."

"That's not the only reason though. Feldway, Jahil, and Demon Lord Dagruel...there are many enemies to be wary of and it's difficult to say that our forces are sufficient. That's why he decided it would be better to let you help us."

Benimaru had seen through Rimuru's thinking almost exactly.
The two had known each other for a long time. It was only natural that he could do that much.
That's why he was feeling even more disappointed at his own worthlessness.

"Lamenting won't do anything. The only thing we can do is simply fulfill the tasks we have been assigned with sincerity," Zegion concluded.

Zegion also understood the importance of the labyrinth. That is why he warned everyone not to allow unnecessary anxiety to interfere with their original mission. Thus, Zegion and his group returned to their territory in order to perfectly prepare for an enemy attack at any time.
Benimaru smiled wryly at Zegion's attitude.

"Hmph, Zegion is right. Each of you, stay sharp and be prepared for the mission!"

In order to fulfill the responsibilities of those entrusted to him by Rimuru, he encouraged everyone to resume their duties.

![break]

Ramiris and her subordinates were busily moving about without hesitation.
There was a lot to do. Being busy could also distract them from their anxiety.
In the meantime, the usual atmosphere of the Control Room had returned...but the normalcy they had regained faded away upon Souei's return.

"So, you're back, Souei."

"Ah. Where is Rimuru-sama?"

"A serious situation has occurred. He's on his way to deal with it."

"Tsk, needing to depend on him again..."

While thinking *that's for sure* to himself, Benimaru asked, "So then, you seem to be in a hurry, is something wrong?"

Souei regained his composure and began to report.

"I've been investigating the movements of Dagruel's people under orders from Rimuru-sama---"

After this preface, he described the results of his investigation in detail.
Within the Holy Void Damargania was a place of refuge, an underground city buried in the desert.
When the once prosperous royal capital was destroyed, the city abandoned the surface and developed a huge underground space centering on an underground lake, and as a result, a living space supporting the lives of tens of thousands of people was created.
The women and children of the giants seemed to be leading their lives as usual there.

Souei saw that they had not been affected by Dagruel's change. Relieved, he set out to investigate the cause of Dagruel's betrayal.
Souei headed to the royal palace.
There were only a few soldiers left, but the administrators were working as usual. They did not know about Dagruel's change of mind and treated Souei as an emissary from an allied country.
After listening to them, Souei was able to pinpoint the cause of this betrayal. Although there was no guarantee that he was right, he decided to return to give the report for the time being, as he had no other information to go on.

"I see. Including the sealed brother, the three brothers were once a single Titan, an evil god who rampaged as a destroyer of the world."

"That's right. He reformed after being defeated by Veldanava-sama, and after meeting Queen Kisara, he became as calm as he is now..."

"Even if it's a myth, it shouldn't be brushed aside as nonsense. We should consider it to be based upon some degree of truth."

"Ah, I think so too. If so, that means..."

"We have to be wary of the resurrection of an evil god..."

Benimaru and Souei nodded their heads in agreement.
Those who had been listening to their conversation were also looking at this with serious expressions.

"Hmm, well it's certainly possible. Dagruel is an incarnation of naturally occurring power, and he fought against Veldanava a long time ago."

The fact that Ramiris even mentioned such a thing had increased the importance of this reasoning.

"By the way, how strong was this evil god?" Benimaru asked Ramiris.

"He was very strong. Not as strong as me, but I think he was stronger than Master back then."

"Hm?"

"Of course, Master is stronger now!!"

Ramiris hurriedly appeased Veldora, who was unhappy at being told that she was stronger than him. Whether or not all this was true was not clear, but at the very least, everyone understood that the evil god was a threat equivalent to a True Dragon.


![soft scene break]


Sometimes bad news follows like a string of bad luck.
The news came from Myourmiles.

"This is serious!" he shouted, rushing into the Control Room. "I just received an urgent message from Miss, no, Her Majesty Elmesia, that Sarion has entered into a state of war!"

"What did you say?!"

Benimaru responded and asked him to explain in detail.
Myourmiles answered that he had received a call through his cell phone.
There were several ways to communicate between Tempest and the Sorcerer's Dynasty of Sarion, but Elmesia seemed to have decided that a direct line was the most reliable. Myourmiles also sensed this and rushed over while conversing with her.

Myourmiles was out of breath but got right to the point.
The two who attacked Sarion were Zalario and Jahil. They led the main force and launched a powerful assault.

"So it was not a diversion, but a full-scale offensive?"

"I'm afraid so."

"Sarion has Silvia-dono, but it's still severe..."

Benimaru growled as he grasped the situation.
Silvia was indeed strong. Even if Benimaru were to fight against her, it would be a pretty good match.
However, Silvia's opponent was Jahil, whom even Benimaru had struggled against.
There is always a certain level of compatibility in a fight, but with the powerful Zalario in addition to Jahil, Silvia alone would not be able to do anything.

"Surveillance Magic 'Argus' has successfully switched over. Local footage is here!!"

With quick resourcefulness, Alpha projected the situation of Sarion on the big screen.
The projection showed a towering tree from the age of the gods, capable of embracing the huge city. The pride of Sarion, the Sacred Tree.
Here and there, flashes of light were twinkling on its trunk and branches. The flashes on the monitor looked small and ephemeral like sparklers, but judging by scale, the images suggested that they were gigantic explosions.

"Jahil's fire. This must be serious."

"What should we do, Benimaru?"

When asked by Souei, Benimaru looked in anguish.
If they didn't send their forces here, Sarion would fall. However, there was no one who could be sent out. A half-hearted force would be nothing more than a drop in the bucket, and if they were to send a force, they needed to generate one that would ensure victory.
Inside the labyrinth, they could carry out suicide missions without worrying about death, so even if they could not win the battle, they could easily stall for time.
However, when it came to dispatching a force...

"I guess I'll have to go."

Benimaru, Diablo, and Zegion. Even with these three, victory against Jahil and the others wasn't certain. As for the others in their group, sending them out would be like heading out to die.

"Shall I go?" Diablo offered, but Benimaru refused. He was not sure why, but he had a bad feeling about it.

"No, I fought Jahil once before. I was no match for him back then, but now I have a chance."

Benimaru had been training hard in the labyrinth in order to reassess his own abilities. Although there was no visible change such as a large increase in the magicule count, his ability had certainly improved.
Even so, there was no guarantee that he could win against Jahil, but in order to blow away everyone's fears, he spoke boldly and showed his confidence.

"Hm."

Diablo also refrained from objecting to that statement, taking Benimaru's intention into consideration.
Benimaru continued, thanking Diablo with a glance.

"Besides, if this is a diversion, it would be risky to further devote our labyrinthine forces, which is the main part of our defense. My intuition is telling me that it's better for you to stay here."

"I see. If Benimaru-dono says as much, then I will comply."

Benimaru is the man whom Rimuru entrusted with the command. In terms of the chain of command, he was above Diablo.
He understood that and did not intend to oppose him.
That did not mean Diablo was against telling him what he thought.

"However, Zalario is strong, isn't he?"

Benimaru was wary of Jahil, but Diablo believed that Zalario was more of a nuisance.

"That man is a true warrior. Putting aside his magicule count, his level of skill is quite high."

Despite this being pointed out, Benimaru's decision did not waver.
No, rather he was still feeling troubled, but he swallowed it down without showing it.

"I'm leaving. It's decided."

"Hmph, you're copying Rimuru-sama, aren't you? But even so, how are you going to take command?"

"I can do that on the go," Benimaru answered.

He was aware that this was quite reckless, but he still intended to push through with his opinion.
Veldora called out to Benimaru.

"Benimaru, have you forgotten about me? If it's me, I can defeat even a small thing like Jahil or Zalario with a single twist, can't I?"

Veldora's confident statement once again shook Benimaru's resolve.
Now that Rimuru had defeated Michael, Feldway had less reason to target Veldora. His knowledge as a commander was urging him to make effective use of his forces rather than to conserve their maximum strength in the depths of the labyrinth. At the same time, however, Benimaru's instinct, something that might be called a wild intuition, was telling him that this was a bad idea. Therefore, Benimaru immediately rejected the idea without showing any sort of turmoil on his face.

"It is true that Jahil is no match for Veldora-sama. However..."

"Mm? What is your concern?"

When asked this question, Benimaru laughed.
He had a lot of concerns.
That was the reason why he could not send out Veldora, their strongest force, against Jahil.

"What I am worried about is the evil god we talked about earlier. I've heard that Demon Lord Dagruel was even brawling buddies with Veldora-sama. In addition, there is a giant named Fenn, the brother of Dagruel, who is said to have been sealed up since ancient times. They were almost evenly matched, weren't they?"

Diablo nodded at Benimaru's questioning glance.

"I didn't see them fighting, but from a distance, I felt that Fenn was the better fighter."

"That's right. Ultima reported it, so he must be a threat. If that's the case. Even with Demon Lord Luminas, I doubt if Shion and Adalmann and the others will be able to win the battle."

Dagruel and Fenn, both of them should be considered as beings comparable to a True Dragon. On top of that, Glassord was also not to be ignored. Since it was said that he had been fighting on equal footing with Demon Lord Leon, he should be considered difficult to defeat. Furthermore, the giants had another powerful opponent in their ranks who had yet to be seen.
Under such circumstances, if the evil god were to be resurrected...

It was all just a possibility.
However, Benimaru could not shake off his unease.

"But there is still time before they reach Lubelius, right? If I go there and quickly clean up the mess---"

"No, that is just wishful thinking. Just as Rimuru-sama has a secret technique to transfer an army, we should act on the assumption that our enemies can do the same."

Rimuru had also advised him to think of a profitable strategy to gain some time. Benimaru agreed with this opinion, and never let his guard down.
And then:

Benimaru felt a tingling sensation on his neck.
It was his instinct telling him to be on the lookout for danger.
He was almost certain that something would happen in Lubelius, though he had no proof of it.

"Therefore, I hope that Veldora-sama will be prepared for any emergency."

Rimuru always said that Veldora was a secret weapon, and Benimaru felt the same way.
It was always better to play your trump card at the last minute. If you were in a situation where you had to play that trump card, it was as if you were proving that the worst had happened.
And if the unexpected happened, it would mean the defeat of your own camp.

"All right. Since I am here, go out there and play an active role to your heart's content!!"

"Kufufufu, I didn't expect Benimaru-dono to go there by himself. Please leave this matter to me. However, I only ask that you take command."

Diablo also agreed to send Benimaru out.
Thus, Benimaru's departure was decided.


![soft scene break]


Benimaru would have to take some other people with him when he left.
Jahil and Zalario were confirmed enemies, but there was still the possibility that other strong opponents would appear.
In such a situation, the defender was at a disadvantage because they had to be prepared to deal with whatever forces may attack them.

"I'm going with you."

Souei was the first to come forward.
Benimaru did not oppose this, and it was decided that Souei would accompany them without any hesitation.
Souei's abilities were ideal for toying with the enemy. He was more versatile than his numerical strength suggested, so he could expect to achieve great results in the battle.
But then came the problem.

The Kurenai was too exhausted to be dispatched with him.
The same went for Gobta and Ranga.
Ranga, who had been transferred from Rimuru's shadow to Gobta's shadow, was also in a deep sleep to recover his lost strength.
Gobta was relatively healthy though...

"Why not just take Gobta with you?"

"I don't want to die yet!"

Well, everyone agreed that they would not participate.
There was a plan to ask the labyrinthine forces to join, but Benimaru rejected the idea, saying that it would be better to have them play an active role in the labyrinth rather than to take them out to an unfamiliar place.
In this situation, there was no choice but to participate in the battle with just the two of them.

"It can't be helped. Well, with the compatibility between Souei and myself, at worst we won't die."

"That's true. There's also Silvia-dono and Her Majesty Elmesia over there. If we cooperate well, we should put up a good fight," Souei also agreed with Benimaru.

The video surveillance of Sarion showed Elmesia as well.

"Miss, so you can fight---or rather, I was surprised to see how strong she is..." Myourmiles murmured, but in fact, everyone was just as surprised and accepted the fact.

Silvia and Elmesia were almost indistinguishable from each other, and surprisingly, their fighting abilities were not so different. The only difference was that Silvia used "thunder" and Elmesia used "wind".
In any case, it was a happy miscalculation for Benimaru and his team to find out that they had another unexpected force on their side. This had slightly increased their chances of winning. Therefore, Benimaru and his group were not pessimistic and decided to set out alone.

![break]

But then, Beta, who was checking the images of various locations, shouted in a stifled voice:

"Urgent report! Milim-sama and Velzard-sama, who are in battle, have started to move. If they continue in that direction, they will hit the Sacred Tree that protects Sarion!!"

Upon hearing this, everyone's eyes focused on the big screen.
The red dot on the screen was Milim and the blue one was Velzard. They were moving at a frightening pace, as if intertwining with each other.
Beta was right, at this rate they would reach Sarion.

"What's going on? Did Rimuru and the others do something?"

Veldora asked a question.
But no one answered.

"Getting caught up in a battle like that means being reduced to ashes no matter where you are," Benimaru muttered, looking pallid.

"Perhaps that is what Feldway is trying to do."

In old Eurazania, Velzard's snowstorm had encased everything in ice. As a result, fortunately or unfortunately, the damage itself had been minimized.
It would be meaningless if Velzard did not lift the ice, but still, hope remained because it had not been completely lost.
However, that was not necessarily the case from here on out.
Any city would be vaporized in an instant by a direct hit from Milim, who had lost all rationality...

And it was not only Sarion that was in danger.

"Is he planning to let the world perish at Milim-sama's hands?"

"I can't say for certain, but he is crazy, so it is a possibility."

Diablo calmly answered Benimaru's question.
If Feldway's intention was truly to spread death and destruction, it could be possible that he was trying to summon Ivarage by using this as a trigger.
Diablo pointed out this possibility.
Benimaru also thought it was possible.
If Diablo was calling him crazy, he must be that much more dangerous. With that kind of a person, there was no way to tell what he was thinking.
Either way, at this rate, Sarion would disappear.
Where would they target after that?

The Western Nations, or was it the Golden Land El Dorado?
There was also the possibility that they would pass through all the cities and head straight for the labyrinth.
They did not have enough information.
In other words, no matter how much he thought about it, there was no answer to the question.

"This is not the time for idle chatter," Benimaru said and stood up.

Rimuru was also there. If Diablo's assumption was correct, he was probably trying desperately to stop it by now. In that case, Benimaru should be taking action instead of worrying about it.
Benimaru was not averse to going with his gut. He had an overconfident side that often gave him the belief that he could do things as long as he tried. However, this was only for himself, and it went against his principles to involve others with it.

"Sorry, Souei."

"Don't worry about it."

That conversation was enough.
With that alone, their minds were prepared to march out to the frontlines of death when---

"I'll go too."

Demon Lord Leon, who had slipped out of the sickroom and had been there for some time, announced that he was going to join the battle.
And furthermore...

"I will accompany you. I have an unspeakable grudge against Jahil."

Even Kagali had come to the Control Room, a determined expression on her face.
Teare was right behind her.

"I have to beat up that son of a bitch and free Footman! I'll do my best!!" she declared with tears in her eyes.

Benimaru had no reason to refuse.

"I will not hesitate. I gratefully accept your offer."

Thus, the participants had been decided.
With this, the missing piece was now in place.


![soft scene break]


Even after Benimaru and the others had left, the Control Room was still in a flurry of activity.
Information was being gathered from all over the world and delivered to Benimaru.

*I don't want anything more to happen.* This was the common wish of all the busy workers. They were all praying for everyone's safe return.
However, even such a modest hope was then shattered.

"An urgent message from Adalmann-sama!! He says that they have come into contact with the Titan army at the Long Wall in the desert!!"

Benimaru's prediction had come true in the worst possible way.
Without mercy, the great battle had begun.